Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Custody and Detention

§ 43-21-301.
Custody orders.

No court other than the youth court shall issue an arrest warrant or custody order for a child in a matter in which the youth court has exclusive original jurisdiction but shall refer the matter to the youth court.

Except as otherwise provided, no child in a matter in which the youth court has exclusive original jurisdiction shall be taken into custody by a law enforcement officer, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other person unless the judge or his designee has issued a custody order to take the child into custody.

The judge or his designee may require a law enforcement officer, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any suitable person to take a child into custody for a period not longer than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and statutory state holidays.

Custody orders under this subsection may be issued if it appears that there is probable cause to believe that:

The child is within the jurisdiction of the court;

Custody is necessary because of any of the following reasons: the child is endangered, any person would be endangered by the child, to ensure the child’s attendance in court at such time as required, or a parent, guardian or custodian is not available to provide for the care and supervision of the child; and

There is no reasonable alternative to custody.

A finding of probable cause under this subsection (3)(a) shall not be based solely upon a positive drug test of a newborn or parent for marijuana; however, a finding of probable cause may be based upon an evidence-based finding of harm to the child or a parent’s inability to provide for the care and supervision of the child due to the parent’s use of marijuana. Probable cause for unlawful use of any controlled substance, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3)(a) for marijuana, may be based: 1. upon a parent’s positive drug test for unlawful use of a controlled substance only if the child is endangered or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; and 2. upon a newborn’s positive drug screen for a controlled substance that was used unlawfully only if the child is endangered or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody.

Custody orders under this subsection shall be written. In emergency cases, a judge or his designee may issue an oral custody order, but the order shall be reduced to writing within forty-eight (48) hours of its issuance.

Each youth court judge shall develop and make available to law enforcement a list of designees who are available after hours, on weekends and on holidays.

The judge or his designee may order, orally or in writing, the immediate release of any child in the custody of any person or agency. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, custody orders as provided by this chapter and authorizations of temporary custody may be written or oral, but, if oral, reduced to writing within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and statutory state holidays. The written order shall:

Specify the name and address of the child, or, if unknown, designate him or her by any name or description by which he or she can be identified with reasonable certainty;

Specify the age of the child, or, if unknown, that he or she is believed to be of an age subject to the jurisdiction of the youth court;

Except in cases where the child is alleged to be a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision, state that the effect of the continuation of the child’s residing within his or her own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, that the placement of the child in foster care is in the best interests of the child, and unless the reasonable efforts requirement is bypassed under Section 43-21-603(7)(c), also state that (i) reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his or her own home, but that the circumstances warrant his removal and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or (ii) the circumstances are of such an emergency nature that no reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, and that there is no reasonable alternative to custody. If the court makes a finding in accordance with (ii) of this paragraph, the court shall order that reasonable efforts be made towards the reunification of the child with his or her family;

State that the child shall be brought immediately before the youth court or be taken to a place designated by the order to be held pending review of the order;

State the date issued and the youth court by which the order is issued; and

Be signed by the judge or his designee with the title of his office.

The taking of a child into custody shall not be considered an arrest except for evidentiary purposes.

No child who has been accused or adjudicated of any offense that would not be a crime if committed by an adult shall be placed in an adult jail or lockup. An accused status offender shall not be held in secure detention longer than twenty-four (24) hours prior to and twenty-four (24) hours after an initial court appearance, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and statutory state holidays, except under the following circumstances: a status offender may be held in secure detention for violating a valid court order pursuant to the criteria as established by the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2002, and any subsequent amendments thereto, and out-of-state runaways may be detained pending return to their home state.

No accused or adjudicated juvenile offender, except for an accused or adjudicated juvenile offender in cases where jurisdiction is waived to the adult criminal court, shall be detained or placed into custody of any adult jail or lockup for a period in excess of six (6) hours.

If any county violates the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the state agency authorized to allocate federal funds received pursuant to the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, 88 Stat. 2750 (codified in scattered Sections of 5, 18, 42 USCS), shall withhold the county’s share of such funds.

Any county that does not have a facility in which to detain its juvenile offenders in compliance with the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection may enter into a contractual agreement to detain or place into custody the juvenile offenders of that county with any county or municipality that does have such a facility, or with the State of Mississippi, or with any private entity that maintains a juvenile correctional facility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection, all counties shall be allowed a one-year grace period from March 27, 1993, to comply with the provisions of this subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 32; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-303.
Taking into custody without a custody order.

No child in a matter in which the youth court has original exclusive jurisdiction shall be taken in custody by any person without a custody order except that:

A law enforcement officer may take a child in custody if:

Grounds exist for the arrest of an adult in identical circumstances; and

Such law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that custody is necessary as defined in Section 43-21-301(3)(b); and

Such law enforcement officer can find no reasonable alternative to custody; or

A law enforcement officer or an agent of the Department of Child Protection Services or the Department of Human Services may take a child into immediate custody if:

There is probable cause to believe that the child is in immediate danger of personal harm; however, probable cause shall not be based solely upon a positive drug test of a newborn or parent for marijuana, but a finding of probable cause may be based upon an evidence-based finding of harm to the child or a parent’s inability to provide for the care and supervision of the child due to the parent’s use of marijuana. Probable cause for unlawful use of any controlled substance, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph (i) for marijuana, may be based: 1. upon a parent’s positive drug test for unlawful use of a controlled substance only if the child is endangered or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; and 2. upon a newborn’s positive drug screen for a controlled substance that was used unlawfully only if the child is endangered or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; and

There is probable cause to believe that immediate custody is necessary as set forth in Section 43-21-301(3); and

There is no reasonable alternative to custody; and

Any other person may take a child in custody if grounds exist for the arrest of an adult in identical circumstances. Such other person shall immediately surrender custody of the child to the proper law enforcement officer who shall thereupon continue custody only as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

When it is necessary to take a child into custody, the least restrictive custody should be selected.

Unless the child is immediately released, the person taking the child into custody shall immediately notify the judge or his designee. A person taking a child into custody shall also make continuing reasonable efforts to notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian and invite the parent, guardian or custodian to be present during any questioning.

A child taken into custody shall not be held in custody for a period longer than reasonably necessary, but not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, and shall be released to his parent, guardian or custodian unless the judge or his designee authorizes temporary custody.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 33; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 14; Laws, 2017, ch. 395, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-305.
Noncustodial interrogation.

A law enforcement officer may stop any child abroad in a public place whom the officer has probable cause to believe is within the jurisdiction of the youth court and may question the child as to his name, address and explanation of his actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-307.
Temporary custody.

The judge or his designee may authorize the temporary custody of a child taken into custody for a period of not longer than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and statutory state holidays if the judge or his designee finds there are grounds to issue a custody order as defined in Section 43-21-301 and such custody order complies with the detention requirements provided in Section 43-21-301(6).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 35; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 43-21-309.
Detention and shelter hearings.

A child who has been ordered or taken into custody may be held in custody for longer than temporary custody if:

A written complaint or petition has been filed; and

A court order has been entered for continued custody following a review of that custody at a detention hearing in delinquency and child in need of supervision cases and at a shelter hearing in abuse and neglect cases.

Reasonable oral or written notice of the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given to the child; to his or her parent, guardian or custodian; to his or her guardian ad litem, if any; to his or her Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) volunteer, if any; and to his or her counsel. If the parent, guardian or custodian cannot be found, the youth court may hold the hearing in the absence of the child’s parent, guardian or custodian.

At the detention or shelter hearing, all parties present shall have the right to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses produced by others. The youth court may, in its discretion, limit the extent but not the right or presentation of evidence and cross-examination of witnesses. The youth court may receive any testimony and other evidence relevant to the necessity for the continued custody of the child without regard to the formal rules of evidence, including hearsay and opinion evidence. All testimony shall be made under oath and may be in narrative form.

At the conclusion of the detention or shelter hearing, the youth court shall order that the child be released to the custody of the child’s parent, guardian or custodian unless the youth court finds and the detention or shelter hearing order recites that:

There is probable cause that the youth court has jurisdiction; and

Custody is necessary as defined in Section 43-21-301(3)(b).

In the case of a shelter hearing, the shelter hearing order shall further recite that the effect of the continuation of the child’s residing within his or her own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, that the placement of the child in foster care is in the best interest of the child, and, unless the reasonable efforts requirement is bypassed under Section 43-21-603(7)(c), the order also must state:

Reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, but that the circumstances warrant his removal and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or

The circumstances are of such an emergency nature that no reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, and there is no reasonable alternative to custody.

In the event that the court makes a finding in accordance with paragraph (b)(ii) of this subsection, the court shall order that reasonable efforts be made towards the reunification of the child with his or her family.

The child with advice of counsel may waive in writing the time of the detention hearing or the detention hearing itself. The child’s guardian ad litem, and parent, guardian or custodian, and child may waive in writing the time of the shelter hearing or the shelter hearing itself. If the child has not reached his tenth birthday, the child’s consent shall not be required.

Any order placing a child into custody shall comply with the requirements provided in Section 43-21-301.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 36; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 15; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 20; Laws, 2004, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 420, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 43-21-311.
Rights in custody.

When a child is taken into custody, he shall immediately be informed of:

The reason for his custody;

The time within which review of the custody shall be held;

His rights during custody including his right to counsel;

All rules and regulations of the place at which he is held;

The time and place of the detention hearing when the time and place is set; and

The conditions of his custody which shall be in compliance with the detention requirements provided in Section 43-21-301(6).

These rights shall be posted where the child may read them, and such rights must be read to the child when he or she is taken into custody.

When a child is taken into custody, the child may immediately telephone his parent, guardian or custodian; his counsel; and personnel of the youth court. Thereafter, he shall be allowed to telephone his counsel or any personnel of the youth court at reasonable intervals. Unless the judge or his designee finds that it is against the best interest of the child, he may telephone his parent, guardian or custodian at reasonable intervals.

When a child is taken into custody, the child may be visited by his counsel and authorized personnel of the youth court at any time. Unless the judge or his designee finds it to be against the best interest of the child, he may be visited by his parent, guardian or custodian during visiting hours which shall be regularly scheduled at least three (3) days per week. The youth court may establish rules permitting visits by other persons.

Except for the child’s counsel, guardian ad litem and authorized personnel of the youth court, no person shall interview or interrogate a child held in a detention or shelter facility unless approval therefor has first been obtained from the judge or his designee. When a child in a detention or shelter facility is represented by counsel or has a guardian ad litem, no person may interview or interrogate the child concerning the violation of a state or federal law, or municipal or county ordinance by the child unless in the presence of his counsel or guardian ad litem or with their consent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 37; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 43-21-313.
Release from custody upon change of circumstances.

A child held in custody under order of the youth court shall be released upon a finding that a change of circumstances makes continued custody unnecessary.

A written request for the release of the child from custody, setting forth the changed circumstances, may be filed by the child; by the child’s parent, guardian or custodian; by the child’s counsel; or by the child’s guardian ad litem, if any.

Based upon the facts stated in the request, the judge may direct that a hearing be held at a date, time and place as fixed by the youth court. Reasonable notice of the hearing shall be given to the child; his parent, guardian or custodian; his counsel; and his guardian ad litem, if any, prior to the hearing. At the hearing, upon receiving evidence, the youth court may grant or deny the request.

A child held in custody in violation of Section 43-21-301(6) shall be immediately transferred to a proper juvenile facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 38; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 43-21-315.
Designation of facilities.

The youth court shall, by general order or rule of court, designate the available detention or shelter facilities to which children shall be delivered when taken into custody. Copies of the order or rule shall be made available to the Department of Human Services and all law enforcement agencies within the territorial jurisdiction of the youth court.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, unless jurisdiction is transferred, no child shall be placed in any jail or place of detention of adults by any person or court unless the child shall be physically segregated from other persons not subject to the jurisdiction of the youth court and the physical arrangement of such jail or place of detention of adults prevents such child from having substantial contact with and substantial view of such other persons; but in any event, the child shall not be confined anywhere in the same cell with persons not subject to the jurisdiction of the youth court. Any order placing a child into custody shall comply with the detention requirements provided in Section 43-21-301(6). This subsection shall not be construed to apply to commitments to the training school under Section 43-21-605(1)(g)(iii).

Any child who is charged with a hunting or fishing violation, a traffic violation, or any other criminal offense for which the youth court shall have power on its own motion to remove jurisdiction from any criminal court, may be detained only in the same facilities designated by the youth court for children within the jurisdiction of the youth court.

After a child is ordered into custody, the youth court may arrange for the custody of the child with any private institution or agency caring for children, may commit the child to the Department of Mental Health pursuant to Section 41-21-61 et seq., or may order the Department of Human Services or any other public agency to provide for the custody, care and maintenance of such child. Provided, however, that the care, custody and maintenance of such child shall be within the statutory authorization and the budgetary means of such institution or facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 39; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 16; Laws, 1993, ch. 439, § 6; Laws, 1996, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1996).

§ 43-21-317.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 570, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

[Laws, 1994, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 546, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 570, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§ 43-21-319.
Correctional facility for juveniles in need of supervision authorized to be built in Tallahatchie County.

In addition to any other provisions of law, it shall be lawful for a correctional facility constructed in Tallahatchie County to house juveniles who have been found delinquent or in need of supervision. The juveniles shall be housed in a correctional facility constructed in Tallahatchie County. The juveniles housed under the provisions of this section and sentenced under the laws of the federal government or its territories or another state shall be under the jurisdiction of the youth or juvenile court or committing jurisdiction in which the juvenile was found to be delinquent or in need of supervision.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 586, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 22, 1999.

§ 43-21-321.
Development of procedures and policies that comply with Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit regulations; provision of educational services to detained students.

All juvenile detention centers shall develop and implement policies and procedures that comply with the regulations promulgated by the Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit.

If a student’s detention will cause the student to miss one or more days of school during the academic school year or special education services when required by state and federal law or when designated on a student’s Individualized Education Program (IEP), the detention center staff shall notify school district officials where the detainee last attended school by the first school day following the student’s placement in the facility. Detention center staff shall not disclose youth court records to the school district, except as provided by Section 43-21-261.

All juvenile detention centers shall adhere to the following minimum standards:

Each center shall have a manual that states the policies and procedures for operating and maintaining the facility, and the manual shall be reviewed annually and revised as needed;

Each center shall have a policy that specifies support for a drug-free workplace for all employees, and the policy shall, at a minimum, include the following:

The prohibition of the use of illegal drugs;

The prohibition of the possession of any illegal drugs except in the performance of official duties;

The procedure used to ensure compliance with a drug-free workplace policy;

The opportunities available for the treatment and counseling for drug abuse; and

The penalties for violation of the drug-free workplace policy; and

Each center shall have a policy, procedure and practice that ensures that personnel files and records are current, accurate and confidential.

Local school districts shall work collaboratively with juvenile detention center staff to provide special education services as required by state and federal law. Upon the written request of the youth court judge for the county in which the detention center is located, a local school district in the county in which the detention center is located, or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district, shall provide a certified teacher to provide educational services to detainees. The youth court judge shall designate the school district which shall be defined as the sponsoring school district. The local home school district shall be defined as the school district where the detainee was last enrolled. Detainees who have received a High School Equivalency diploma shall be provided remedial instruction in math and language arts, or other areas as determined by the sponsoring school district, which may be computer-based instruction, as well as career counseling opportunities. Teacher selection shall be in consultation with the youth court judge. The Legislature shall annually appropriate sufficient funds for the provision of educational services, as provided under this section, to detainees in detention centers.

To ensure students in youth detention facilities continue to receive appropriate educational services, local education agencies (LEAs) must have policies and procedures to ensure the relevant records of students who move to, and from, youth detention facilities are sent to and received from the sponsoring school district as soon as practicable to enable the effective delivery of educational services.

The sponsoring school district, or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district, shall be responsible for providing the instructional program and, when required by state and federal law, special education services, for the detainee while in detention during the sponsoring school district’s academic calendar and a six-week summer enrichment program, the dates which are determined by the sponsoring school district. The enrichment program shall be facilitated by certified or classified district staff and shall be focused academically on mathematics and English language arts instruction, and may include other primary core subject areas, including character education. The six-week enrichment program shall not set aside any guidelines set forth by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. The summer enrichment program may be computer-based and have an abbreviated school day that shall not be less than four (4) hours per day. After forty-eight (48) hours of detention during the sponsoring school district’s academic calendar and six-week enrichment program, the detainee shall receive the following services which may be computer-based:

Diagnostic assessment of grade-level mastery of reading and math skills;

Individualized instruction and practice to address any weaknesses identified in the assessment conducted under paragraph (a) of this subsection if the detainee is in the center for more than forty-eight (48) hours during the sponsoring school district’s academic calendar and six-week enrichment program; and

Character education to improve behavior.

No later than the tenth day of detention during the sponsoring school district’s academic calendar and six-week enrichment program, the detainee shall begin an extended detention education program. A team consisting of a certified teacher provided by the local sponsoring school district or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district, the appropriate official from the local home school district, and the youth court counselor or representative will develop an individualized academic program (IAP) for the detainee, where appropriate as determined by the teacher of the sponsoring school district, or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district. The detainee’s parent or guardian shall participate on the team unless excused by the youth court judge. Failure of any party to participate shall not delay implementation of this education program. Any student identified under IDEA will utilize the student’s current IEP in lieu of the IAP.

It shall be the responsibility of the student’s local home school district school to ensure that all related services identified on a student’s IEP are provided in accordance with the student’s IEP.

It shall be the responsibility of the student’s local home school district to collaborate with the sponsoring school district to ensure that all students, including students with disabilities, are appropriately included in general state and district-wide assessments, including assessments required by the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as amended, and state law.

Teachers in youth detention facilities serving IDEA-eligible students must be licensed with endorsements required by state and federal law, and related services personnel and paraprofessionals must meet state and federal qualifications for those personnel.

The sponsoring school district, or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district, shall provide the detention center with an appropriate and adequate computer lab to serve detainees. The Legislature shall annually appropriate sufficient funds to equip and maintain the computer labs. The computer lab shall become the property of the detention centers and the sponsoring school districts shall maintain and update the labs.

The Mississippi Department of Education will collaborate with the appropriate state and local agencies, juvenile detention centers and local school districts to ensure the provision of educational services to every student placed in a juvenile detention center. The Mississippi Department of Education has the authority to develop and promulgate policies and procedures regarding financial reimbursements to the sponsoring school district from school districts that have students of record or compulsory-school-age residing in said districts placed in a youth detention center. Such services may include, but not be limited to: assessment and math and reading instruction, character education and behavioral counseling. The Mississippi Department of Education shall work with the appropriate state and local agencies, juvenile detention centers and local school districts to annually determine the proposed costs for educational services to youth placed in juvenile detention centers and annually request sufficient funding for such services as necessary.

Juvenile detention centers shall ensure that staffs create transition planning for youth leaving the facilities. This process shall be led by the student’s youth court counselor, and shall include staff from the educational center. Plans shall include providing the youth and his or her parents or guardian with copies of the youth’s detention center education and health records, information regarding the youth’s home community, referrals to mental and counseling services when appropriate, and providing assistance in making initial appointments with community service providers; the transition team will work together to help the detainee successfully transition back into the home school district once released from detention. The transition team will consist of a certified teacher provided by the local sponsoring school district, or a private provider agreed upon by the youth court judge and sponsoring school district, the appropriate official from the local home school district, the school attendance officer assigned to the local home school district, and the youth court counselor or representative. The detainee’s parent or guardian shall participate on the team unless excused by the youth court judge. Failure of any party to participate shall not delay implementation of this education program.

Student’s records, including grades and attendance, shall be part of the student’s transition and submitted to the receiving school district for review. Grades received from the Juvenile Detention Center (JDC) education program shall be incorporated into each student’s academic performance grade.

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety Juvenile Detention Facilities Monitoring Unit shall monitor the detention facilities for compliance with these minimum standards, and no child shall be housed in a detention facility the monitoring unit determines is substantially out of compliance with the standards prescribed in this section. In accordance with Section 43-21-907(5), Mississippi Code of 1972, the Mississippi Department of Education has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations related to the education of all children housed in a juvenile detention facility, to conduct inspections of the facility’s educational services at least annually or more often as deemed necessary and shall provide the licensing agency with its determination of the facility’s compliance with the education provisions. The licensing agency shall use the information in its determination of the facility’s eligibility for licensure. It is the intention of the Legislature that the implementation of the provisions of Section 43-21-321 shall not create accountability or accreditation requirements or standards upon the sponsoring school district or the home district that are greater, more restrictive or more demanding than those requirements imposed upon local school districts in the provision of educational services to the general population of students.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 602, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 564, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 429, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-323.
Juvenile Detention Facilities Monitoring Unit established; duties and responsibilities; confidentiality of records of monitor and communications of reporter.

There is established the Juvenile Detention Facilities Monitoring Unit within the Department of Public Safety to work in cooperation with the Council of Youth Court Judges and Referees and the Juvenile Justice Advisory Committee described in Sections 45-1-33 and 43-21-125; the Juvenile Detention Facilities Monitoring Unit is the licensing agency for juvenile detention facilities, as defined in Section 43-21-905. The unit shall be responsible for investigating, evaluating and securing the rights of children held in juvenile justice facilities, including detention centers, training schools and group homes throughout the state to ensure that the facilities operate in compliance with national best practices and state and federal law. The monitoring unit shall only monitor group homes that serve as a dispositional placement for delinquent youth pursuant to Section 43-21-605. Nothing in this section shall be construed as giving the monitoring unit authority to monitor foster care or shelter care placements. All monitors shall be employees of the Department of Public Safety. The inspections by the unit shall encompass the following:

To review and evaluate (i) all procedures set by detention centers, training schools and group homes and (ii) all records containing information related to the operations of the detention centers, training schools and group homes;

To review and investigate all complaints filed with the monitoring unit concerning children’s treatment in detention centers, training schools and group homes;

To conduct quarterly monitoring visits of all detention centers, training schools and group homes. The monitor shall have access to an entire facility and shall conduct confidential interviews with youth and facility staff;

To advise a facility on how to meet the needs of children who require immediate attention;

To provide technical assistance and advice to juvenile detention facilities, which will assist the facilities in complying with state and federal law.

To carry out the duties in this subsection (1) a monitor may consult with an administrator, employee, child, parent, expert or other individual in the course of monitoring or investigating. In addition, the monitor may review court documents and other confidential records as necessary to fulfill these duties.

Additional duties of the monitoring unit are as follows:

To make available on a quarterly basis to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and each member of the Legislature and each member of a county board of supervisors, a report that describes:

The work of the monitoring unit;

The results of any review or investigation undertaken by the monitoring unit;

Any allegations of abuse or injury of a child; and

Any problems concerning the administration of a detention center.

The reports described in this subsection shall keep the names of all children, parents and employees confidential.

To promote awareness among the public and the children held in detention by providing the following:

How the monitoring unit may be contacted;

The purpose of the monitoring unit; and

The services that the monitoring unit provides.

The records of a monitor shall be confidential. Any child, staff member, parent or other interested individual may communicate to a monitor in person, by mail, by phone, or any other means. All communications shall be kept confidential and privileged, except that the youth court and the facility shall have access to such records, but the identity of reporters shall remain confidential.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-324.
Training for all Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit employees and juvenile detention center administrators.

The Department of Public Safety shall contract with a juvenile justice expert who has substantial experience in the administration of constitutionally compliant juvenile facilities and significant experience monitoring juvenile justice facilities for a local jurisdiction, state, or as a court-appointed monitor. The contractor shall provide training to all of the Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit employees within six (6) months of April 1, 2014. All employees of the Monitoring Unit must successfully complete the training as determined by the juvenile justice expert through the use of a pretest and posttest, facility tour, or any other criteria the expert selects. The training shall include interviewing skills, report writing, and information regarding standard practices in juvenile detention centers. In addition to the training for the Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit, the Department of Public Safety shall arrange for at least eight (8) hours of training for the administrators of the juvenile detention centers in the state by the juvenile justice expert. The Department of Public Safety shall ensure that its contract with the juvenile justice expert includes a provision for technical assistance to the staff of the Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit for at least six (6) months after the completion of the training.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 471, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2014.).